California statutes. Public Resources Code
State plane coordinates may be used for property identification on any map, survey, conveyance, or other instrument which delineates or affects the title to real property or which delineates, describes, or refers to the property, or any part thereof. However, to constitute, when recorded, constructive notice thereof under the recording laws, the delineating, describing, or referring to the property, or part thereof, shall also refer to data appearing of record in any office, the records of which constitute constructive notice under the recording laws. That record data shall be sufficient to identify the property without recourse to those coordinates, and in case of conflict between them, the references to that recorded data shall be controlling for the purpose of determining constructive notice under the recording laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.

The use of the term “California Coordinate System” on any map or document or in any field notes shall be suffixed either with “27” (shown as “CCS27”) for coordinates based on NAD27, with “83” (shown as “CCS83”) for coordinates based on NAD83, and with “2022” (shown as CCS2022) for coordinates based upon NATRF2022 or PATRF2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 3.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.1.

When CCS83 coordinates are shown on any map, corner record, or other document, the map, corner record, or document shall state the datum realization tag in parentheses and epoch date,
 in a decimal year format to two decimal places, that is the basis of the coordinate values shown. The
 datum realization tag and epoch date shall be shown on the map, corner record, or other document by an appropriate note on the map, corner record, or document or by adding a suffix in parentheses after CCS83 that states the epoch; for example, “CCS83 (2011) epoch 2010.00,” “CCS83 (NSRS) epoch 2007.00,” and so forth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 4.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.2.

The epoch for a survey using CCS83 coordinates shall be the published NGS or CSRC datum realization and epoch date of a published coordinate for a controlling station used for that survey. These surveys performed after
 December 31, 1999, shall be based on the
 “NAD83 (1992) epoch 1991.35” datum realization and epoch or a subsequent published NGS or CSRC datum realization and epoch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 5.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.3.

When the published epochs of the controlling stations for a survey using CCS83 or CCS2022 coordinates are not the same, appropriate adjustments shall be made to the horizontal positions of controlling stations so that the coordinates of all the controlling stations are consistent. These adjustments in the horizontal positions of controlling stations shall be made in accordance with procedures and values published by the NGS or CSRC.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 6.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.4.

When a purported order of accuracy of second order or better is shown for CCS83 or CCS2022 coordinate values on any map, corner record, or other document prior to January 1, 2006, that map, corner record, or other document shall use the order of accuracy as defined by the FGCS or FGDC If an FGCS or FGDC
 order of accuracy is claimed for a survey or a map, it shall be justified by additional written data that shows equipment, procedures, closures, adjustments, and a control diagram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 7.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.5.

When CCS83 or CCS2022 coordinates are shown on any map, corner record, or record of survey, a mapping angle, combined grid factor, and the elevation used to determine the combined grid factor shall be shown on the map, corner record, or record of survey for at least one representative point.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 8.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8816.

The use of the State Plane Coordinates by any person, corporation, or governmental agency engaged in land surveying or mapping is optional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8817.

Prior to January 1, 1995, use of State Plane Coordinates for new projects may be based either on CCS27 or CCS83. On or after January 1, 1995, when State Plane Coordinates are used on new surveys and new mapping projects, the use shall be limited to CCS83. However, this section does not preclude a survey from retracement of a CCS27 survey. After January 1 2025, new surveys and mapping projects may be based upon CCS2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 9.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8818.

This chapter does not impair or invalidate land titles, legal descriptions, or jurisdictional or land boundaries and, further, this chapter does not impair or invalidate references to, or the use of, CCS 27 coordinates, except as provided in Section 8817.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

8819.

This chapter does not prohibit the use of new surveying technologies or techniques for which FGCS specifications or other accepted specifications have not yet been published.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Topographical Mapping [8831. - 8834.]

8831.

It is the policy of the State of California to provide for basic topographic map coverage in aid of development and conservation of the natural and economic resources of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

8832.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8833.

The department shall investigate and prepare a complete report on mapping, including plans and recommendations for an adequate mapping program for California, and shall adopt a general plan and program for the accomplishment of the policy declared in this chapter. The general plan and program so adopted, or as amended or modified, shall be the authorized general plan and program to be carried out by the department. The department may from time to time make such further investigations and reports upon mapping as deemed proper by it in pursuance of the policy declared in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8834.

All map production work to be undertaken pursuant to this chapter shall be in cooperation with the federal government. With the approval of the Department of General Services, the department may enter into agreements or contracts with the federal government or any of its agencies for performance of map production work in accordance with the general plan and program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Geodetic Datums and the California Spatial Reference Network [8850. - 8861.]

8850.

The official geodetic datums and spatial reference network for use within the State of California shall be as defined by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8851.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “NGS” means National Geodetic Survey or its successor.

(b) “CSRC” means California Spatial Reference Center or its successor.

(c) “NAD83” means North American Datum of 1983.

(d) “NATRF2022” means the North American Terrestrial Reference Frame of 2022.

(e) “PATRF2022” means the Pacific Terrestrial Reference Frame of 2022.

(f) “NAVD88”
 means North American Vertical Datum of 1988.

(g) “NAPGD2022” means the North American-Pacific Geopotential Datum of 2022.

(h) “ITRF” means International Terrestrial Reference Frame as defined by the International Earth Rotation Service.

(i) “GPS” means Global Positioning System and includes other, similar space-based systems.

(j) “FGDC” means Federal Geographic Data Committee or it successor.

(k) “FGCS” means the Federal Geodetic Control Subcommittee or its successor.

(l) “CSRN” means California Spatial Reference Network.

(m) “NSRS” means the National Spatial Reference System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 10.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8852.

The official geodetic datum to which horizontal positions and ellipsoid heights are referenced within the State of California shall be NAD83, NATRF2022, or PATRF2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 11.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8853.

The official geodetic datum to which orthometric heights are referenced within the State of California shall be NAVD88 or NAPGD2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 12.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8854.

When horizontal positions, ellipsoid heights, or orthometric heights are shown on a document, the document shall show the geodetic datum, including datum realization tag and epoch date, if appropriate, to which the values are referenced, whether NAD83 (NSRS) epoch 2007.00, NATRF2022, NAVD88, NAPGD2022, ITRF, or another datum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 13.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8855.

The official geodetic reference network for use within the State of California shall be the CSRN as defined by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8856.

The geodetic control stations within the State of California having horizontal positions conforming to all of the following requirements shall be part of the CSRN. The horizontal positions shall:

(a) Be referenced to NAD83 or NATRF2022.

(b) Have been determined by GPS survey methods.

(c) Be published by NGS or CSRC.

(d) Have a NGS or CSRC published network accuracy of two centimeters or better as defined by FGDC or a NGS or CSRC published accuracy of first order or better as defined by FGCS.

(e) Have a NGS or CSRC published horizontal velocity or a horizontal velocity that can be determined using procedures and values published by NGS or CSRC.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 14.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8857.

The geodetic control stations within the State of California having ellipsoid heights conforming to all of the following requirements shall be part of the CSRN. The ellipsoid heights shall:

(a) Be referenced to NAD83 or NATRF2022.

(b) Have been determined by GPS survey methods.

(c) Be published by NGS or CSRC.

(d) Have a NGS or CSRC published network accuracy of five centimeters or better as defined by FGDC or a NGS or CSRC published accuracy of fourth order, class II, or better as
 defined by FGCS.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 15.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8858.

The geodetic control stations within the State of California having orthometric heights determined by GPS survey methods and conforming to all of the following requirements shall be part of the CSRN. The orthometric heights shall:

(a) Be based on NAD83 and referenced to NAVD88, or alternatively, NATRF2022 and NAPGD2022.

(b) Be published by NGS or CSRC.

(c) Have a NGS or CSRC published network accuracy of five centimeters or better as defined by FGDC.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 16.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8859.

The geodetic control stations within the State of California having orthometric heights determined by differential leveling survey methods and conforming to all of the following requirements shall be part of the CSRN. The orthometric heights shall:

(a) Be referenced to NAVD88.

(b) Be published by NGS or CSRC.

(c) Have a NGS or CSRC published accuracy of third order, class II or better as defined by FGCS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8860.

The use of the NAD83, NATRF2022, PATRF2022, NAVD88, NAPGD2022, and CSRN by any person, firm, or governmental agency is optional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 17.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8861.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to prohibit the appropriate use of other datums, including ITRF, and other geodetic reference networks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. California Geodetic Coordinates [8870. - 8880.]

8870.

Geodetic coordinates within the State of California that are based on the North American Datum of 1983 and conforming to the provisions of this chapter shall be known as “California Geodetic Coordinates of 1983.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8871.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “NGS” means National Geodetic Survey or its successor.

(b) “CSRC” means California Spatial Reference Center or its successor.

(c) “NAD83” means North American Datum of 1983.

(d) “GPS” means Global Positioning System and includes other, similar spaced-based systems.

(e) “FGDC” means the Federal Geographic Data Committee or its successor.

(f) “FGCS” means the Federal Geodetic Control Subcommittee or its successor.

(g) “CSRN” means California Spatial Reference Network as defined by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8850), “Geodetic Datums and the California Spatial Reference Network.”

(h) “CGC83” means California Geodetic Coordinates of 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8872.

The phrase “California Geodetic Coordinates of 1983” or any abbreviation thereof, such as “CGC83,” shall be used only in reference to geodetic coordinates based on NAD83 and conforming to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8873.

CGC83 values shall be expressed as latitude, longitude, or ellipsoid height values or as Cartesian coordinates (x, y, z). When Cartesian coordinates are used, the symbols and conventions utilized shall be the same as that used by NGS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8874.

CGC83 latitude and longitude values shall be expressed in degrees, minutes, seconds, and decimals of a second, or degrees and decimals of a degree. CGC83 ellipsoid height values shall be expressed in meters and decimals of a meter or feet and decimals of a foot. When ellipsoid height values are expressed in feet, the “U.S. Survey Foot” (one foot equals 1200/3937 meters) shall be used as the standard foot. CGC83 Cartesian coordinate values shall be expressed in meters and decimals of a meter.

When CGC83 values are stated on any document, the unit of measure shall be clearly stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8875.

The survey that establishes a CGC83 value or values shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) The survey shall be referenced to and shall have field-observed statistically independent connections to one or more appropriate reference stations that is one of the following:

(1) CSRN station.

(2) Geodetic control station located outside of the State of California that meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN except that the station is outside California.

(3) Existing CGC83 station that:

(A) Is shown on a map filed with the applicable county surveyor by a public officer, subdivision map, corner record, or record of survey.

(B) Meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN except that the station and its data are not published by NGS or CSRC.

(C) Has an accuracy, conforming to the applicable CSRN requirements, stated for the station’s value.

(4) Existing CGC83 station that is shown on a public map or document that:

(A) Is compiled and maintained by the applicable county surveyor.

(B) Meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN except that the station and its data are not published by NGS or CSRC.

(C) Has an accuracy, conforming to the applicable CSRN requirements, stated for the station’s value.

(b) If an accuracy is to be claimed for the CGC83 value or values established, the claimed accuracy shall be an accuracy standard published by FGDC or FGCS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8876.

If an accuracy is claimed for a CGC83 value or values, the survey that established the value or values shall be documented on a map, record of survey, corner record, or other document that includes, at a minimum, the following:

(a) For each CGC83 station, the resultant CGC83 value or values.

(b) The epoch (date), in a decimal year format to two decimal places, that is the basis of the CGC83 values shown. The epoch shall be the published NGS or CSRC epoch of a controlling station for the survey.

If the published epochs for the horizontal positions of the controlling stations are not the same, appropriate adjustments shall be made to the horizontal values of the controlling stations so that said values of all the controlling stations are at one consistent epoch published by NGS or CSRC. These adjustments in the coordinates of the controlling stations shall be made in accordance with procedures and values published by NGS or CSRC.

(c) The FGDC and FGCS accuracy standard of the CGC83 value or values established. FGDC accuracies shall be identified as either a local or network accuracy.

(d) Additional written data that justifies the FGDC or FGCS accuracy standard shown. Such additional written data shall include observation equipment, control diagram including required field-observed statistically independent connection or connections, adjustment methodology and software used, a summary of the procedures used or a reference to published commonly accepted procedural specifications, final residuals or closures, and other data essential for others to evaluate the survey.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8877.

When a CGC83 value or values are shown on any document, the document shall include the following:

(a) A statement that the geodetic coordinate value or values shown are a CGC83 value or values; exceptions shall be noted.

(b) The station or stations to which the CGC83 value or values are referenced and connected and the geodetic coordinate value or values and the published or stated accuracy or accuracies of said reference station or stations.

(c) The epoch of the CGC83 value or values shown. The epoch shall conform to provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 8876.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8878.

The use of CGC83 by any person, firm, or governmental agency is optional.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8879.

This chapter does not impair or invalidate land titles, legal descriptions, or jurisdictional or land boundaries and, further, this chapter does not impair or invalidate references to, or the use of, datums or latitude, longitude, or ellipsoid height values or other geodetic coordinate values that do not conform to this chapter except as specified in Section 8872.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8880.

This chapter does not prohibit the use of new surveying technologies or techniques for which FGCS specifications or other accepted specifications have not yet been published.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. California Orthometric Heights [8890. - 8902.]

8890.

Orthometric heights within the State of California that are based on the North America Vertical Datum of 1988 and conforming to the provisions of this chapter shall be known as “California Orthometric Heights of 1988.” Orthometric heights are commonly referred to as “elevations.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8891.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “NGS” means National Geodetic Survey or its successor.

(b) “CSRC” means California Spatial Reference Center or its successor.

(c) “NAVD88” means North American Vertical Datum of 1988.

(d) “GPS” means Global Positioning System and includes other, similar space-based systems.

(e) “FGDC” means the Federal Geographic Data Committee or its successor.

(f) “FGCS” means the Federal Geodetic Control Subcommittee or its successor.

(g) “CSRN” means California Spatial Reference Network as defined by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8850), “Geodetic Datums and the California Spatial Reference Network.”

(h) “COH88” means California Orthometric Heights of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8892.

The phrase “California Orthometric Heights of 1988” or any abbreviation, such as “COH88,” thereof shall be used only in reference to orthometric heights based on NAVD88 and conforming to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8893.

COH88 values shall be expressed in meters and decimals of a meter or in feet and decimals of a foot. When COH88 values are expressed in feet, the “U.S. Survey Foot,” (one foot equals 1200/3937 meters) shall be used as the standard foot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8894.

COH88 values that are determined from differential leveling surveys shall be known as “leveled COH88” values. COH88 values that are determined from GPS surveys and the appropriate application of a geoid model shall be known as “derived COH88” values.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8895.

When a geoid model is used to determine derived COH88 values, it shall be the latest geoid model published by NGS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8896.

The accuracy of derived COH88 values may be improved by applying a “local orthometric height correction” to the geoid height determined from the latest, applicable geoid model published by NGS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8897.

The survey that establishes a COH88 value or values shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) The survey shall be referenced to and shall have field-observed statistically independent connections to one or more orthometric height reference stations that is or are one of the following:

(1) CSRN station.

(2) Geodetic control station located outside of the State of California that meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN except that the station is outside California.

(3) Existing COH88 station that (A) is shown on a map filed with the applicable county surveyor by a public officer, subdivision map, corner record, or record of survey, (B) meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN, except that the station and its data are not published by NGS or CSRC, and (C) has an accuracy, conforming to the applicable CSRN requirements, stated for the station’s value.

(4) Existing COH88 station that is shown on a public map or document that (A) is compiled and maintained by the applicable county surveyor, (B) meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN except that the station and its data are not published by NGS or CSRC, and (C) has an accuracy, conforming to the applicable CSRN requirements, stated for the station’s value.

(b) If an accuracy is to be claimed for the COH88 value or values established, the claimed accuracy shall be an accuracy standard published by FGDC or FGCS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8898.

If an accuracy is claimed for a COH88 value or values, the survey that established the value or values shall be documented on a map, record of survey, corner record, or other document that includes, at a minimum, the following:

(a) For each COH88 station, the resultant COH88 value.

(b) For each individual COH88 value, whether it is a leveled COH88 or a derived COH88 value.

(c) For leveled COH88 values, the beginning and ending dates of the observations used to determine the values.

(d) For derived COH88 values, the date of the NGS geoid model used to determine the values.

(e) When derived COH88 values are shown and reflect the application of a “local orthometric height correction model,” written data that justifies the model’s validity. Such written data shall include a summary of the procedures, computations, analysis, and validation process used to develop the model.

(f) For derived COH88 values, the epoch (date), in a decimal year format to two decimal places, that is the basis of the COH88 values shown. Said epoch shall be the published NGS or CSRC epoch of a controlling station for the survey.

(g) The FGDC or FGCS accuracy standard of the COH88 value or values established. FGDC accuracies shall be identified as either a local or network accuracy.

(h) Additional written data that justifies the FGDC or FGCS accuracy standard shown. Such additional written data shall include observation equipment, control diagram including required field-observed statistically independent connection or connections, adjustment methodology and software used, a summary of the procedures used or a reference to a published commonly accepted procedural specifications, final residuals or closures, and other data essential for others to evaluate the survey.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8899.

When a COH88 value or values are shown on any document, the document shall include the following:

(a) A statement that the orthometric height or heights shown are a COH88 value or values; exceptions shall be noted.

(b) The station or stations to which the COH88 value or values are referenced and connected and the orthometric height value or values and the published or stated accuracy or accuracies of said referenced station or stations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8900.

The use of COH88 by any person, firm, or governmental agency is optional.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8901.

This chapter does not impair or invalidate land titles, legal descriptions, or jurisdictional or land boundaries and, further, this chapter does not impair or invalidate references to, or the use of, datums, elevations, orthometric heights, or other height values that do not conform to this chapter except as specified in Section 8892 in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8902.

This chapter does not prohibit the use of new surveying technologies or techniques for which FGCS specifications or other accepted specifications have not yet been published.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. RESOURCE CONSERVATION [9001. - 9972.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [9001. - 9044.]



  ARTICLE 1. Policy of State [9001. - 9003.]

9001.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares all of the following:

(1) Resource conservation, enhancement, restoration, adaptation, and resilience are of fundamental importance to the prosperity and welfare of the people of this state. The Legislature believes that the state must assume leadership in formulating and putting into effect a statewide program of soil, water, and biodiversity conservation, enhancement, restoration, adaptation, and resilience and related natural resource conservation.

(2) The climate crisis is happening now, impacting California in unprecedented ways, including intensifying wildfires, mudslides, floods, and drought, sea level rise, and extreme
 heat, that threaten our economy, communities, public safety, and cultural and natural resources.

(3) Resource conservation districts are important partners to the state in achieving the state’s ever-evolving goals to protect, conserve, restore, and enhance natural resources and to mitigate and adapt to the impacts of climate change.

(4) This division is enacted to accomplish the following purposes:

(A) To provide the means by which the state may cooperate with the United States and with resource conservation districts organized pursuant to this division in securing the adoption in this state of conservation, enhancement, restoration, adaptation, and resilience practices, including, but not limited to, farm, range, open space, urban development, wildlife, recreation, watershed, water quality, and woodland, best
 adapted to save the basic resources, soil, water, and air of the state from unreasonable and economically preventable waste and destruction.

(B) To provide for the organization and operation of resource conservation districts for the purposes of the protection, conservation, restoration, or enhancement of natural resources, the improvement or enhancement of adaptation or resilience to climate change, the mitigation or sequestration of carbon emissions on natural lands and working lands, soil and water conservation, the control of runoff, the prevention and control of soil erosion, and erosion stabilization, including, but not limited to, these purposes in open areas, agricultural areas, urban development, wildlife areas, recreational developments, watershed management, the protection of water quality and water reclamation, the development of storage and distribution of water, and the treatment of each acre of land according to its needs.

(b) The districts, in addition to any other authority provided by law, may do all of the following:

(1) Ensure consistency with the authorities and policies of the United States, this state, counties, cities, public districts, other resource conservation districts, persons, associations, and corporations.

(2) With the consent of the owner, construct on privately or publicly owned lands any necessary works for the protection, conservation, restoration, or enhancement of natural resources, the improvement or enhancement of adaptation or resilience to climate change, the mitigation or sequestration of carbon emissions, or the prevention and control of soil erosion and erosion stabilization.

(3) Facilitate coordinated resource management efforts for watershed
 restoration and enhancement.

(4) Develop and implement projects and programs for the conservation, enhancement, restoration, adaptation, and resilience of soil, water, and biodiversity and related natural resource conservation.

(c) The districts shall not conserve water for power purposes or produce or distribute power for their own use or for the use of others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 4.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.5.

(a) It is the policy of the state that the protection and management of natural and working lands is an important strategy in meeting the state’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals. The protection and management of those lands can result in the removal of carbon from the atmosphere and the sequestration of carbon in, above, and below the ground.

(b) The protection and management of natural and working lands provides multiple public benefits, including, but not limited to, assisting
 with adaptation to the impacts of climate change, improving water quality and quantity, flood protection, ensuring healthy fish and wildlife populations, and providing recreational and economic benefits.

(c) All state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Food and Agriculture, and the California Environmental Protection Agency, and their respective departments, boards, and commissions, shall consider the policy set forth in this section when revising, adopting, or establishing policies, regulations, expenditures, or grant criteria relating to the protection and management of natural and working lands. State agencies shall implement this requirement in conjunction with the state’s other strategies to meet its greenhouse gas
 emissions reduction goals and with the intent to, among other things, promote the cooperation of owners of natural and working lands.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Working lands” means lands used for farming, grazing, or the production of forest products.

(2) “Natural lands” means lands consisting of forests, grasslands, deserts, freshwater and riparian systems, wetlands, coastal and estuarine areas, watersheds, wildlands, or wildlife habitat, or lands used for recreational purposes such as parks, urban and community forests, trails, greenbelts, and other similar
 open-space land. For purposes of this paragraph, “parks” includes, but is not limited to, areas that provide public green space.

(e) Nothing in this section shall affect the existing authority of a city, county, city and county, state agency, department, commission, or board relating to natural and working lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (SB 1386)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination:

(a) That the construction and maintenance on privately or publicly owned land of works for resource conservation is in the general public interest and for the general public benefit.

(b) That the expenditure of state, county, city, district, or other public funds that are available or may become available for planning, designing, or implementing the above and for the construction or maintenance of such control or preventive works on privately or publicly owned land constitutes expenditure for the general public benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that resource conservation districts are legal subdivisions of the state and, as such, are not-for-profit entities. For the purpose of contracting with state agencies only, resource conservation districts shall be considered agencies of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 994, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [9015. - 9034.]

9015.

As used in this division the following terms have the meanings attributed to them in this article, unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9016.

“Commission” means the State Resource Conservation Commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9017.

“Department” means the Department of Conservation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9018.

“Director” means the Director of Conservation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9019.

“Division” means the Division of Resource Conservation of the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9020.

“Chief” means the Chief of the Division of Resource Conservation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.

“District” or “soil conservation district” means a resource conservation district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9022.

“Public district” means a district established under the law of this state, other than a resource conservation district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9023.

“Directors” means the board of directors of a district, and when powers are conferred or duties are imposed upon directors in this division the powers shall be exercised and the duties performed by the directors acting as a body and not as individuals.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9024.

“Board” means the county board of supervisors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9025.

“Principal county” means the county in which all or the greatest portion of privately owned land of a district is situated. The principal county remains the same regardless of any change in boundaries. The principal county of a consolidated district is that county in which all or the greatest portion of the privately owned area in the consolidated district is located.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9026.

“Principal district” means the district which has the greater land area of two districts proposed to be consolidated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9027.

“Landowner” or “owner of land” includes a holder of evidence of title and, also, a holder of land under a possessory right acquired by entry or purchase from the United States or the State of California. A guardian, executor, administrator, or other person holding property in a trust capacity under an appointment of court is the “owner” of such property for the purposes of this division and as such may do and perform any act provided for herein when authorized by an order of court which order may be made without notice.
